test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_VV_makomii_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Pl: makmiinyshinwan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: makmiinsshiwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: makmiinsshiwaang
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: makmiinsshiwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: makmiinsshinwan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: makmiinsshiniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Pl: makmiinsshinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: nmakmiinyshibniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinyshibniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinyshibniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: nmakmiinsshibniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinsshibniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinsshibniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gmakmiinyshibniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinyshibniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinyshibniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gmakmiinsshibniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsshibniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsshibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: makmiinyshibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiinyshibniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiinyshibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: makmiinsshibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiinsshibniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiinsshibniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: makmiinyshibniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiinyshibniing
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiinyshibniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: makmiinsshibniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiinsshibniing
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiinsshibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiinynaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinynaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinynaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiinsnaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinsnaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinsnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinynaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinynaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinynaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinywaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinywaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinywaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinsnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsnaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinswaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinswaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinswaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiinywaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiinywaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiinywaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+4: makmiinyniwbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiinyniwbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiinyniwbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiinswaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiinswaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiinswaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: makmiinsniwbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiinsniwbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiinsniwbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmakmiimshinaanba
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakmiimshinaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmakmiimshinaanba
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiimshinaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmakmiimshiwaaba
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiimshiwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: makmiimshiwaaba
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makmiimshiwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: makmiimshinwiba
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: makmiimshinwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmakmiimshinaanin
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmakmiimshinaaning
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmakmiimshinaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmakmiimshinaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmakmiimshinaaning
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmakmiimshinaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmakmiimshiwaan
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmakmiimshiwaang
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmakmiimshiwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: makmiimshiwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: makmiimshiwaang
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: makmiimshiwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: makmiimshinwan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: makmiimshiniing
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: makmiimshinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmakmiimshibniin
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakmiimshibniing
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakmiimshibniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmakmiimshibniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakmiimshibniing
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakmiimshibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makmiimshibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiimshibniing
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiimshibniin
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makmiimshibniin
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiimshibniing
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiimshibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiimnaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiimnaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiimnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiimnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiimnaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiimnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiimwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiimwaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiimwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiimwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiimwaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiimwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: makmiimniwbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiimniwbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiimniwbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiishnaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiishnaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiishnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiishnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiishnaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiishnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiishwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiishwaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiishwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiishwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiishwaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiishwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makmiishniwbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiishniwbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiishniwbaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmakmiinymishnaanba
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinymishnaandig
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmakmiinsmishnaanba
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinsmishnaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmakmiinymishnaanba
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinymishnaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmakmiinymishwaaba
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinymishwaadig
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmakmiinsmishnaanba
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinsmishnaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmakmiinsmishwaaba
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinsmishwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: makmiinymishwaaba
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makmiinymishwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: makmiinymishniwba
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: makmiinymishniwdig
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: makmiinsmishwaaba
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makmiinsmishwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: makmiinsmishniwba
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: makmiinsmishniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmakmiinymishnaanin
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmakmiinymishnaaning
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmakmiinymishnaanin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmakmiinsmishnaanin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmakmiinsmishnaaning
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmakmiinsmishnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmakmiinymishnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmakmiinymishnaaning
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmakmiinymishnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmakmiinymishwaan
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmakmiinymishwaang
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmakmiinymishwaan
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmakmiinsmishnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmakmiinsmishnaaning
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmakmiinsmishnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmakmiinsmishwaan
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmakmiinsmishwaang
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmakmiinsmishwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: makmiinymishwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: makmiinymishwaang
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: makmiinymishwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: makmiinymishniwan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: makmiinymishniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: makmiinymishniwan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: makmiinsmishwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: makmiinsmishwaang
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: makmiinsmishwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: makmiinsmishniwan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: makmiinsmishniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: makmiinsmishniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmakmiinymishbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinymishbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinymishbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmakmiinsmishbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinsmishbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinsmishbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmakmiinymishbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinymishbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinymishbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmakmiinsmishbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsmishbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsmishbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makmiinymishbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiinymishbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiinymishbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makmiinsmishbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiinsmishbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiinsmishbaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makmiinymishbaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiinymishbaniing
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiinymishbaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makmiinsmishbaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makmiinsmishbaniing
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makmiinsmishbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiinyminaanbaniin
